Illinois, session 104th, HB2771.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)7    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; Medicaid reimbursement 8rates for hospital inpatient and outpatient services. To 9provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of the 10changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly to Sections 5A-2, 5A-7, 5A-8, 5A-10, and 5A-12.7 of 12the Illinois Public Aid Code, emergency rules implementing the 13changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 14Assembly to Sections 5A-2, 5A-7, 5A-8, 5A-10, and 5A-12.7 of 15the Illinois Public Aid Code may be adopted in accordance with 16Section 5-45 by the Department of Healthcare and Family 17Services. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by 18Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed necessary for the 19public interest, safety, and welfare.20    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 21of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  22    Section 10. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by   HB2771 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1changing Sections 5A-2, 5A-5, 5A-7, 5A-8, 5A-10, 5A-12.7, 25A-14, and 12-4.105 as follows: 3    (305 ILCS 5/5A-2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5A-2)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)5    Sec. 5A-2. Assessment. 6    (a)(1) Subject to Sections 5A-3 and 5A-10, for State 7fiscal years 2009 through 2018, or as long as continued under 8Section 5A-16, an annual assessment on inpatient services is 9imposed on each hospital provider in an amount equal to 10$218.38 multiplied by the difference of the hospital's 11occupied bed days less the hospital's Medicare bed days, 12provided, however, that the amount of $218.38 shall be 13increased by a uniform percentage to generate an amount equal 14to 75% of the State share of the payments authorized under 15Section 5A-12.5, with such increase only taking effect upon 16the date that a State share for such payments is required under 17federal law. For the period of April through June 2015, the 18amount of $218.38 used to calculate the assessment under this 19paragraph shall, by emergency rule under subsection (s) of 20Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, be 21increased by a uniform percentage to generate $20,250,000 in 22the aggregate for that period from all hospitals subject to 23the annual assessment under this paragraph. 24    (2) In addition to any other assessments imposed under 25this Article, effective July 1, 2016 and semi-annually   HB2771 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1thereafter through June 2018, or as provided in Section 5A-16, 2in addition to any federally required State share as 3authorized under paragraph (1), the amount of $218.38 shall be 4increased by a uniform percentage to generate an amount equal 5to 75% of the ACA Assessment Adjustment, as defined in 6subsection (b-6) of this Section. 7    For State fiscal years 2009 through 2018, or as provided 8in Section 5A-16, a hospital's occupied bed days and Medicare 9bed days shall be determined using the most recent data 10available from each hospital's 2005 Medicare cost report as 11contained in the Healthcare Cost Report Information System 12file, for the quarter ending on December 31, 2006, without 13regard to any subsequent adjustments or changes to such data. 14If a hospital's 2005 Medicare cost report is not contained in 15the Healthcare Cost Report Information System, then the 16Illinois Department may obtain the hospital provider's 17occupied bed days and Medicare bed days from any source 18available, including, but not limited to, records maintained 19by the hospital provider, which may be inspected at all times 20during business hours of the day by the Illinois Department or 21its duly authorized agents and employees. 22    (3) Subject to Sections 5A-3, 5A-10, and 5A-16, for State 23fiscal years 2019 and 2020, an annual assessment on inpatient 24services is imposed on each hospital provider in an amount 25equal to $197.19 multiplied by the difference of the 26hospital's occupied bed days less the hospital's Medicare bed   HB2771 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1days. For State fiscal years 2019 and 2020, a hospital's 2occupied bed days and Medicare bed days shall be determined 3using the most recent data available from each hospital's 2015 4Medicare cost report as contained in the Healthcare Cost 5Report Information System file, for the quarter ending on 6March 31, 2017, without regard to any subsequent adjustments 7or changes to such data. If a hospital's 2015 Medicare cost 8report is not contained in the Healthcare Cost Report 9Information System, then the Illinois Department may obtain 10the hospital provider's occupied bed days and Medicare bed 11days from any source available, including, but not limited to, 12records maintained by the hospital provider, which may be 13inspected at all times during business hours of the day by the 14Illinois Department or its duly authorized agents and 15employees. Notwithstanding any other provision in this 16Article, for a hospital provider that did not have a 2015 17Medicare cost report, but paid an assessment in State fiscal 18year 2018 on the basis of hypothetical data, that assessment 19amount shall be used for State fiscal years 2019 and 2020.20    (4) Subject to Sections 5A-3 and 5A-10 and to subsection 21(b-8), for the period of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020 22and calendar years 2021 through 2024 2026, an annual 23assessment on inpatient services is imposed on each hospital 24provider in an amount equal to $221.50 multiplied by the 25difference of the hospital's occupied bed days less the 26hospital's Medicare bed days, provided however: for the period   HB2771 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, (i) the assessment 2shall be equal to 50% of the annual amount; and (ii) the amount 3of $221.50 shall be retroactively adjusted by a uniform 4percentage to generate an amount equal to 50% of the 5Assessment Adjustment, as defined in subsection (b-7). For the 6period of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020 and calendar 7years 2021 through 2024 2026, a hospital's occupied bed days 8and Medicare bed days shall be determined using the most 9recent data available from each hospital's 2015 Medicare cost 10report as contained in the Healthcare Cost Report Information 11System file, for the quarter ending on March 31, 2017, without 12regard to any subsequent adjustments or changes to such data. 13If a hospital's 2015 Medicare cost report is not contained in 14the Healthcare Cost Report Information System, then the 15Illinois Department may obtain the hospital provider's 16occupied bed days and Medicare bed days from any source 17available, including, but not limited to, records maintained 18by the hospital provider, which may be inspected at all times 19during business hours of the day by the Illinois Department or 20its duly authorized agents and employees. Should the change in 21the assessment methodology for fiscal years 2021 through 22December 31, 2022 not be approved on or before June 30, 2020, 23the assessment and payments under this Article in effect for 24fiscal year 2020 shall remain in place until the new 25assessment is approved. If the assessment methodology for July 261, 2020 through December 31, 2022, is approved on or after July   HB2771 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b11, 2020, it shall be retroactive to July 1, 2020, subject to 2federal approval and provided that the payments authorized 3under Section 5A-12.7 have the same effective date as the new 4assessment methodology. In giving retroactive effect to the 5assessment approved after June 30, 2020, credit toward the new 6assessment shall be given for any payments of the previous 7assessment for periods after June 30, 2020. Notwithstanding 8any other provision of this Article, for a hospital provider 9that did not have a 2015 Medicare cost report, but paid an 10assessment in State Fiscal Year 2020 on the basis of 11hypothetical data, the data that was the basis for the 2020 12assessment shall be used to calculate the assessment under 13this paragraph until December 31, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2022 14and through December 31, 2024, a safety-net hospital that had 15a change of ownership in calendar year 2021, and whose 16inpatient utilization had decreased by 90% from the prior year 17and prior to the change of ownership, may be eligible to pay a 18tax based on hypothetical data based on a determination of 19financial distress by the Department. Subject to federal 20approval, the Department may, by January 1, 2024, develop a 21hypothetical tax for a specialty cancer hospital which had a 22structural change of ownership during calendar year 2022 from 23a for-profit entity to a non-profit entity, and which has 24experienced a decline of 60% or greater in inpatient days of 25care as compared to the prior owners 2015 Medicare cost 26report. This change of ownership may make the hospital   HB2771 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1eligible for a hypothetical tax under the new hospital 2provision of the assessment defined in this Section. This new 3hypothetical tax may be applicable from January 1, 2024 4through December 31, 2026. 5    (5) Subject to Sections 5A-3 and 5A-10, beginning January 61, 2025, an annual assessment on inpatient services is imposed 7on each hospital provider in an amount equal to $362, or any 8reduction thereof in accordance with this subsection, 9multiplied by the difference of the hospital's occupied bed 10days less the hospital's Medicare bed days; however, the rate 11shall be $221.50 until the Department receives federal 12approval and implements the reimbursement rates in subsection 13(r) of Section 5A-12.7. The Department may bill for the 14difference between the assessment rate of $362, or any 15reduction thereof in accordance with this subsection, and 16$221.50 no earlier than 17 calendar days after implementing 17the reimbursement rates in subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7.18        (A) Upon receiving federal approval for the 19    reimbursement rates in subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7, 20    the Department shall bill the hospital for the incremental 21    difference in total tax due resulting from the increase 22    provided in this subsection for the number of months from 23    January 1, 2025 through the date of federal approval. The 24    amount shall be due and payable no later than December 31, 25    2025 and no earlier than 17 calendar days after 26    implementing the reimbursement rates in subsection (r) of   HB2771 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    Section 5A-12.7. The Department shall bill hospitals in 2    the same proportional rate as the Department has 3    implemented the inpatient reimbursement rates in 4    subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7.5        (B) Beginning January 1, 2025, a hospital's occupied 6    bed days and Medicare bed days shall be determined using 7    the most recent data available from each hospital's 2015 8    Medicare cost report as contained in the Healthcare Cost 9    Report Information System file, for the quarter ending on 10    March 31, 2017, without regard to any subsequent 11    adjustments or changes to such data. If a hospital's 2015 12    Medicare cost report is not contained in the Healthcare 13    Cost Report Information System, then the Department may 14    obtain the hospital provider's occupied bed days and 15    Medicare bed days from any source available, including, 16    but not limited to, records maintained by the hospital 17    provider, which may be inspected at all times during 18    business hours of the day by the Department or its duly 19    authorized agents and employees. If the reimbursement 20    rates in subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7 require 21    reduction to comply with federal spending limits, then the 22    tax rate of $362 shall be reduced, in accordance with 23    subsection (s) of Section 5A-12.7, by the same percentage 24    reduction to payments required to comply with federal 25    spending limits. 26    (b) (Blank).   HB2771 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    (b-5)(1) Subject to Sections 5A-3 and 5A-10, for the 2portion of State fiscal year 2012, beginning June 10, 2012 3through June 30, 2012, and for State fiscal years 2013 through 42018, or as provided in Section 5A-16, an annual assessment on 5outpatient services is imposed on each hospital provider in an 6amount equal to .008766 multiplied by the hospital's 7outpatient gross revenue, provided, however, that the amount 8of .008766 shall be increased by a uniform percentage to 9generate an amount equal to 25% of the State share of the 10payments authorized under Section 5A-12.5, with such increase 11only taking effect upon the date that a State share for such 12payments is required under federal law. For the period 13beginning June 10, 2012 through June 30, 2012, the annual 14assessment on outpatient services shall be prorated by 15multiplying the assessment amount by a fraction, the numerator 16of which is 21 days and the denominator of which is 365 days. 17For the period of April through June 2015, the amount of 18.008766 used to calculate the assessment under this paragraph 19shall, by emergency rule under subsection (s) of Section 5-45 20of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, be increased by 21a uniform percentage to generate $6,750,000 in the aggregate 22for that period from all hospitals subject to the annual 23assessment under this paragraph. 24    (2) In addition to any other assessments imposed under 25this Article, effective July 1, 2016 and semi-annually 26thereafter through June 2018, in addition to any federally   HB2771 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1required State share as authorized under paragraph (1), the 2amount of .008766 shall be increased by a uniform percentage 3to generate an amount equal to 25% of the ACA Assessment 4Adjustment, as defined in subsection (b-6) of this Section. 5    For the portion of State fiscal year 2012, beginning June 610, 2012 through June 30, 2012, and State fiscal years 2013 7through 2018, or as provided in Section 5A-16, a hospital's 8outpatient gross revenue shall be determined using the most 9recent data available from each hospital's 2009 Medicare cost 10report as contained in the Healthcare Cost Report Information 11System file, for the quarter ending on June 30, 2011, without 12regard to any subsequent adjustments or changes to such data. 13If a hospital's 2009 Medicare cost report is not contained in 14the Healthcare Cost Report Information System, then the 15Department may obtain the hospital provider's outpatient gross 16revenue from any source available, including, but not limited 17to, records maintained by the hospital provider, which may be 18inspected at all times during business hours of the day by the 19Department or its duly authorized agents and employees. 20    (3) Subject to Sections 5A-3, 5A-10, and 5A-16, for State 21fiscal years 2019 and 2020, an annual assessment on outpatient 22services is imposed on each hospital provider in an amount 23equal to .01358 multiplied by the hospital's outpatient gross 24revenue. For State fiscal years 2019 and 2020, a hospital's 25outpatient gross revenue shall be determined using the most 26recent data available from each hospital's 2015 Medicare cost   HB2771 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1report as contained in the Healthcare Cost Report Information 2System file, for the quarter ending on March 31, 2017, without 3regard to any subsequent adjustments or changes to such data. 4If a hospital's 2015 Medicare cost report is not contained in 5the Healthcare Cost Report Information System, then the 6Department may obtain the hospital provider's outpatient gross 7revenue from any source available, including, but not limited 8to, records maintained by the hospital provider, which may be 9inspected at all times during business hours of the day by the 10Department or its duly authorized agents and employees. 11Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article, for a 12hospital provider that did not have a 2015 Medicare cost 13report, but paid an assessment in State fiscal year 2018 on the 14basis of hypothetical data, that assessment amount shall be 15used for State fiscal years 2019 and 2020.16    (4) Subject to Sections 5A-3 and 5A-10 and to subsection 17(b-8), for the period of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020 18and calendar years 2021 through 2024 2026, an annual 19assessment on outpatient services is imposed on each hospital 20provider in an amount equal to .01525 multiplied by the 21hospital's outpatient gross revenue, provided however: (i) for 22the period of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, the 23assessment shall be equal to 50% of the annual amount; and (ii) 24the amount of .01525 shall be retroactively adjusted by a 25uniform percentage to generate an amount equal to 50% of the 26Assessment Adjustment, as defined in subsection (b-7). For the   HB2771 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1period of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020 and calendar 2years 2021 through 2024 2026, a hospital's outpatient gross 3revenue shall be determined using the most recent data 4available from each hospital's 2015 Medicare cost report as 5contained in the Healthcare Cost Report Information System 6file, for the quarter ending on March 31, 2017, without regard 7to any subsequent adjustments or changes to such data. If a 8hospital's 2015 Medicare cost report is not contained in the 9Healthcare Cost Report Information System, then the Illinois 10Department may obtain the hospital provider's outpatient 11revenue data from any source available, including, but not 12limited to, records maintained by the hospital provider, which 13may be inspected at all times during business hours of the day 14by the Illinois Department or its duly authorized agents and 15employees. Should the change in the assessment methodology 16above for fiscal years 2021 through calendar year 2022 not be 17approved prior to July 1, 2020, the assessment and payments 18under this Article in effect for fiscal year 2020 shall remain 19in place until the new assessment is approved. If the change in 20the assessment methodology above for July 1, 2020 through 21December 31, 2022, is approved after June 30, 2020, it shall 22have a retroactive effective date of July 1, 2020, subject to 23federal approval and provided that the payments authorized 24under Section 12A-7 have the same effective date as the new 25assessment methodology. In giving retroactive effect to the 26assessment approved after June 30, 2020, credit toward the new   HB2771 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1assessment shall be given for any payments of the previous 2assessment for periods after June 30, 2020. Notwithstanding 3any other provision of this Article, for a hospital provider 4that did not have a 2015 Medicare cost report, but paid an 5assessment in State Fiscal Year 2020 on the basis of 6hypothetical data, the data that was the basis for the 2020 7assessment shall be used to calculate the assessment under 8this paragraph until December 31, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2022 9and through December 31, 2024, a safety-net hospital that had 10a change of ownership in calendar year 2021, and whose 11inpatient utilization had decreased by 90% from the prior year 12and prior to the change of ownership, may be eligible to pay a 13tax based on hypothetical data based on a determination of 14financial distress by the Department. 15    (5) Subject to Sections 5A-3 and 5A-10, beginning January 161, 2025, an annual assessment on outpatient services is 17imposed on each hospital provider in an amount equal to 18.03273, or any reduction thereof in accordance with this 19subsection, multiplied by the hospital's outpatient gross 20revenue; however the rate shall remain .01525, until the 21Department receives federal approval and implements the 22reimbursement rates of payment in subsection (r) of Section 235A-12.7. The Department may bill for the difference between 24the assessment multiplier of .03273 and .01525 no earlier than 2517 calendar days after the first payment based on the 26reimbursement rates in subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7.  HB2771 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        (A) Upon receiving federal approval for the 2    reimbursement rates in subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7, 3    the Department shall bill the hospital for the incremental 4    difference in total tax due resulting from the increase 5    provided in this subsection for the number of months from 6    January 1, 2025 through the date of federal approval. The 7    amount shall be due and payable no later than December 31, 8    2025 and no earlier than 17 calendar days after 9    implementing the reimbursement rates in subsection (r) of 10    Section 5A-12.7. The Department shall bill hospitals in 11    the same proportional rate as the Department has 12    implemented the outpatient reimbursement rates in 13    subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7.14        (B) Beginning January 1, 2025, a hospital's outpatient 15    gross revenue shall be determined using the most recent 16    data available from each hospital's 2015 Medicare cost 17    report as contained in the Healthcare Cost Report 18    Information System file, for the quarter ending on March 19    31, 2017, without regard to any subsequent adjustments or 20    changes to such data. If a hospital's 2015 Medicare cost 21    report is not contained in the Healthcare Cost Report 22    Information System, then the Department may obtain the 23    hospital provider's outpatient revenue data from any 24    source available, including, but not limited to, records 25    maintained by the hospital provider, which may be 26    inspected at all times during business hours of the day by   HB2771 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    the Department or its duly authorized agents and 2    employees. If the reimbursement rates in subsection (r) of 3    Section 5A-12.7 require reduction to comply with federal 4    spending limits, then the tax rate of .03273 shall be 5    reduced, in accordance with subsection (s) of Section 6    5A-12.7, by the same percentage reduction to payments 7    required to comply with federal spending limits. 8    (b-6)(1) As used in this Section, "ACA Assessment 9Adjustment" means:10        (A) For the period of July 1, 2016 through December 11    31, 2016, the product of .19125 multiplied by the sum of 12    the fee-for-service payments to hospitals as authorized 13    under Section 5A-12.5 and the adjustments authorized under 14    subsection (t) of Section 5A-12.2 to managed care 15    organizations for hospital services due and payable in the 16    month of April 2016 multiplied by 6.17        (B) For the period of January 1, 2017 through June 30, 18    2017, the product of .19125 multiplied by the sum of the 19    fee-for-service payments to hospitals as authorized under 20    Section 5A-12.5 and the adjustments authorized under 21    subsection (t) of Section 5A-12.2 to managed care 22    organizations for hospital services due and payable in the 23    month of October 2016 multiplied by 6, except that the 24    amount calculated under this subparagraph (B) shall be 25    adjusted, either positively or negatively, to account for 26    the difference between the actual payments issued under   HB2771 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    Section 5A-12.5 for the period beginning July 1, 2016 2    through December 31, 2016 and the estimated payments due 3    and payable in the month of April 2016 multiplied by 6 as 4    described in subparagraph (A).5        (C) For the period of July 1, 2017 through December 6    31, 2017, the product of .19125 multiplied by the sum of 7    the fee-for-service payments to hospitals as authorized 8    under Section 5A-12.5 and the adjustments authorized under 9    subsection (t) of Section 5A-12.2 to managed care 10    organizations for hospital services due and payable in the 11    month of April 2017 multiplied by 6, except that the 12    amount calculated under this subparagraph (C) shall be 13    adjusted, either positively or negatively, to account for 14    the difference between the actual payments issued under 15    Section 5A-12.5 for the period beginning January 1, 2017 16    through June 30, 2017 and the estimated payments due and 17    payable in the month of October 2016 multiplied by 6 as 18    described in subparagraph (B).19        (D) For the period of January 1, 2018 through June 30, 20    2018, the product of .19125 multiplied by the sum of the 21    fee-for-service payments to hospitals as authorized under 22    Section 5A-12.5 and the adjustments authorized under 23    subsection (t) of Section 5A-12.2 to managed care 24    organizations for hospital services due and payable in the 25    month of October 2017 multiplied by 6, except that:26            (i) the amount calculated under this subparagraph   HB2771 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        (D) shall be adjusted, either positively or 2        negatively, to account for the difference between the 3        actual payments issued under Section 5A-12.5 for the 4        period of July 1, 2017 through December 31, 2017 and 5        the estimated payments due and payable in the month of 6        April 2017 multiplied by 6 as described in 7        subparagraph (C); and8            (ii) the amount calculated under this subparagraph 9        (D) shall be adjusted to include the product of .19125 10        multiplied by the sum of the fee-for-service payments, 11        if any, estimated to be paid to hospitals under 12        subsection (b) of Section 5A-12.5.13    (2) The Department shall complete and apply a final 14reconciliation of the ACA Assessment Adjustment prior to June 1530, 2018 to account for:16        (A) any differences between the actual payments issued 17    or scheduled to be issued prior to June 30, 2018 as 18    authorized in Section 5A-12.5 for the period of January 1, 19    2018 through June 30, 2018 and the estimated payments due 20    and payable in the month of October 2017 multiplied by 6 as 21    described in subparagraph (D); and22        (B) any difference between the estimated 23    fee-for-service payments under subsection (b) of Section 24    5A-12.5 and the amount of such payments that are actually 25    scheduled to be paid.26    The Department shall notify hospitals of any additional   HB2771 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1amounts owed or reduction credits to be applied to the June 22018 ACA Assessment Adjustment. This is to be considered the 3final reconciliation for the ACA Assessment Adjustment.4    (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 5if for any reason the scheduled payments under subsection (b) 6of Section 5A-12.5 are not issued in full by the final day of 7the period authorized under subsection (b) of Section 5A-12.5, 8funds collected from each hospital pursuant to subparagraph 9(D) of paragraph (1) and pursuant to paragraph (2), 10attributable to the scheduled payments authorized under 11subsection (b) of Section 5A-12.5 that are not issued in full 12by the final day of the period attributable to each payment 13authorized under subsection (b) of Section 5A-12.5, shall be 14refunded.15    (4) The increases authorized under paragraph (2) of 16subsection (a) and paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5) shall be 17limited to the federally required State share of the total 18payments authorized under Section 5A-12.5 if the sum of such 19payments yields an annualized amount equal to or less than 20$450,000,000, or if the adjustments authorized under 21subsection (t) of Section 5A-12.2 are found not to be 22actuarially sound; however, this limitation shall not apply to 23the fee-for-service payments described in subsection (b) of 24Section 5A-12.5.25    (b-7)(1) As used in this Section, "Assessment Adjustment" 26means:  HB2771 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        (A) For the period of July 1, 2020 through December 2    31, 2020, the product of .3853 multiplied by the total of 3    the actual payments made under subsections (c) through (k) 4    of Section 5A-12.7 attributable to the period, less the 5    total of the assessment imposed under subsections (a) and 6    (b-5) of this Section for the period.7        (B) For each calendar quarter beginning January 1, 8    2021 through December 31, 2022, the product of .3853 9    multiplied by the total of the actual payments made under 10    subsections (c) through (k) of Section 5A-12.7 11    attributable to the period, less the total of the 12    assessment imposed under subsections (a) and (b-5) of this 13    Section for the period.14        (C) Beginning on January 1, 2023, and each subsequent 15    July 1 and January 1, the product of .3853 multiplied by 16    the total of the actual payments made under subsections 17    (c) through (j) and subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7 18    attributable to the 6-month period immediately preceding 19    the period to which the adjustment applies, less the total 20    of the assessment imposed under subsections (a) and (b-5) 21    of this Section for the 6-month period immediately 22    preceding the period to which the adjustment applies. 23    (2) The Department shall calculate and notify each 24hospital of the total Assessment Adjustment and any additional 25assessment owed by the hospital or refund owed to the hospital 26on either a semi-annual or annual basis. Such notice shall be   HB2771 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1issued at least 30 days prior to any period in which the 2assessment will be adjusted. Any additional assessment owed by 3the hospital or refund owed to the hospital shall be uniformly 4applied to the assessment owed by the hospital in monthly 5installments for the subsequent semi-annual period or calendar 6year. If no assessment is owed in the subsequent year, any 7amount owed by the hospital or refund due to the hospital, 8shall be paid in a lump sum. If the calculation that is 9computed under this Section could result in a decrease in the 10Department's federal financial participation percentage for 11payments authorized under Section 5A-12.7, then the Department 12shall instead apply a uniform percentage reduction to the 13payment rates outlined in subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.7 14for all classes as defined in subsections (g) and (h) of 15Section 5A-12.7 by an amount no more than necessary to 16maximize federal reimbursement. 17    (3) The Department shall publish all details of the 18Assessment Adjustment calculation performed each year on its 19website within 30 days of completing the calculation, and also 20submit the details of the Assessment Adjustment calculation as 21part of the Department's annual report to the General 22Assembly. 23    (b-8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 24the Department shall reduce the assessments imposed on each 25hospital under subsections (a) and (b-5) by the uniform 26percentage necessary to reduce the total assessment imposed on   HB2771 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1all hospitals by an aggregate amount of $240,000,000, with 2such reduction being applied by June 30, 2022. The assessment 3reduction required for each hospital under this subsection 4shall be forever waived, forgiven, and released by the 5Department. 6    (c) (Blank). 7    (d) Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this 8Section, the Department is authorized to adopt rules to reduce 9the rate of any annual assessment imposed under this Section, 10as authorized by Section 5-46.2 of the Illinois Administrative 11Procedure Act. 12    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 13any plan providing for an assessment on a hospital provider as 14a permissible tax under Title XIX of the federal Social 15Security Act and Medicaid-eligible payments to hospital 16providers from the revenues derived from that assessment shall 17be reviewed by the Illinois Department of Healthcare and 18Family Services, as the Single State Medicaid Agency required 19by federal law, to determine whether those assessments and 20hospital provider payments meet federal Medicaid standards. If 21the Department determines that the elements of the plan may 22meet federal Medicaid standards and a related State Medicaid 23Plan Amendment is prepared in a manner and form suitable for 24submission, that State Plan Amendment shall be submitted in a 25timely manner for review by the Centers for Medicare and 26Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health   HB2771 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1and Human Services and subject to approval by the Centers for 2Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department 3of Health and Human Services. No such plan shall become 4effective without approval by the Illinois General Assembly by 5the enactment into law of related legislation. Notwithstanding 6any other provision of this Section, the Department is 7authorized to adopt rules to reduce the rate of any annual 8assessment imposed under this Section. Any such rules may be 9adopted by the Department under Section 5-50 of the Illinois 10Administrative Procedure Act. 11    (f) To provide for the expeditious and timely 12implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 13amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 14may adopt emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 15Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of 16emergency rules is deemed to be necessary for the public 17interest, safety, and welfare. 18(Source: P.A. 102-886, eff. 5-17-22; 103-102, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (305 ILCS 5/5A-5)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5A-5)20    Sec. 5A-5. Notice; penalty; maintenance of records. 21    (a) The Illinois Department shall send a notice of 22assessment to every hospital provider subject to assessment 23under this Article. The notice of assessment shall notify the 24hospital of its assessment and shall be sent after receipt by 25the Department of notification from the Centers for Medicare   HB2771 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1and Medicaid Services of the U.S. Department of Health and 2Human Services that the payment methodologies required under 3this Article and, if necessary, the waiver granted under 42 4CFR 433.68 have been approved. The notice shall be on a form 5prepared by the Illinois Department and shall state the 6following: 7        (1) The name of the hospital provider. 8        (2) The address of the hospital provider's principal 9    place of business from which the provider engages in the 10    occupation of hospital provider in this State, and the 11    name and address of each hospital operated, conducted, or 12    maintained by the provider in this State. 13        (3) The occupied bed days, occupied bed days less 14    Medicare days, adjusted gross hospital revenue, or 15    outpatient gross revenue of the hospital provider 16    (whichever is applicable), the amount of assessment 17    imposed under Section 5A-2 for the State fiscal year for 18    which the notice is sent, and the amount of each 19    installment to be paid during the State fiscal year. 20        (4) (Blank). 21        (5) Other reasonable information as determined by the 22    Illinois Department. 23    (b) If a hospital provider conducts, operates, or 24maintains more than one hospital licensed by the Illinois 25Department of Public Health, the provider shall pay the 26assessment for each hospital separately.   HB2771 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article, 2in the case of a person who ceases to conduct, operate, or 3maintain a hospital in respect of which the person is subject 4to assessment under this Article as a hospital provider, the 5assessment for the State fiscal year in which the cessation 6occurs shall be adjusted by multiplying the assessment 7computed under Section 5A-2 by a fraction, the numerator of 8which is the number of days in the year during which the 9provider conducts, operates, or maintains the hospital and the 10denominator of which is 365. Immediately upon ceasing to 11conduct, operate, or maintain a hospital, the person shall pay 12the assessment for the year as so adjusted (to the extent not 13previously paid). 14    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article, a 15provider who commences conducting, operating, or maintaining a 16hospital, upon notice by the Illinois Department, shall pay 17the assessment computed under Section 5A-2 and subsection (e) 18in installments on the due dates stated in the notice and on 19the regular installment due dates for the State fiscal year 20occurring after the due dates of the initial notice. 21    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article, 22for State fiscal years 2009 through 2018, in the case of a 23hospital provider that did not conduct, operate, or maintain a 24hospital in 2005, the assessment for that State fiscal year 25shall be computed on the basis of hypothetical occupied bed 26days for the full calendar year as determined by the Illinois   HB2771 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1Department. Notwithstanding any other provision in this 2Article, for the portion of State fiscal year 2012 beginning 3June 10, 2012 through June 30, 2012, and for State fiscal years 42013 through 2018, in the case of a hospital provider that did 5not conduct, operate, or maintain a hospital in 2009, the 6assessment under subsection (b-5) of Section 5A-2 for that 7State fiscal year shall be computed on the basis of 8hypothetical gross outpatient revenue for the full calendar 9year as determined by the Illinois Department. 10    Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article, 11beginning July 1, 2018 through December 31, 2026, in the case 12of a hospital provider that did not conduct, operate, or 13maintain a hospital in the year that is the basis of the 14calculation of the assessment under this Article, the 15assessment under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 165A-2 for the State fiscal year shall be computed on the basis 17of hypothetical occupied bed days for the full calendar year 18as determined by the Illinois Department, except that for a 19hospital provider that did not have a 2015 Medicare cost 20report, but paid an assessment in State fiscal year 2018 on the 21basis of hypothetical data, that assessment amount shall be 22used for State fiscal years 2019 and 2020; however, for State 23fiscal year 2020, the assessment amount shall be increased by 24the proportion that it represents of the total annual 25assessment that is generated from all hospitals in order to 26generate $6,250,000 in the aggregate for that period from all   HB2771 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1hospitals subject to the annual assessment under this 2paragraph.3    Notwithstanding any other provision in this Article, 4beginning July 1, 2018 through December 31, 2026, in the case 5of a hospital provider that did not conduct, operate, or 6maintain a hospital in the year that is the basis of the 7calculation of the assessment under this Article, the 8assessment under subsection (b-5) of Section 5A-2 for that 9State fiscal year shall be computed on the basis of 10hypothetical gross outpatient revenue for the full calendar 11year as determined by the Illinois Department, except that for 12a hospital provider that did not have a 2015 Medicare cost 13report, but paid an assessment in State fiscal year 2018 on the 14basis of hypothetical data, that assessment amount shall be 15used for State fiscal years 2019 and 2020; however, for State 16fiscal year 2020, the assessment amount shall be increased by 17the proportion that it represents of the total annual 18assessment that is generated from all hospitals in order to 19generate $6,250,000 in the aggregate for that period from all 20hospitals subject to the annual assessment under this 21paragraph. 22    (f) Every hospital provider subject to assessment under 23this Article shall keep sufficient records to permit the 24determination of adjusted gross hospital revenue for the 25hospital's fiscal year. All such records shall be kept in the 26English language and shall, at all times during regular   HB2771 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1business hours of the day, be subject to inspection by the 2Illinois Department or its duly authorized agents and 3employees. 4    (g) The Illinois Department may, by rule, provide a 5hospital provider a reasonable opportunity to request a 6clarification or correction of any clerical or computational 7errors contained in the calculation of its assessment, but 8such corrections shall not extend to updating the cost report 9information used to calculate the assessment. 10    (h) (Blank). 11(Source: P.A. 102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 12    (305 ILCS 5/5A-7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5A-7)13    Sec. 5A-7. Administration; enforcement provisions. 14    (a) The Illinois Department shall establish and maintain a 15listing of all hospital providers appearing in the licensing 16records of the Illinois Department of Public Health, which 17shall show each provider's name and principal place of 18business and the name and address of each hospital operated, 19conducted, or maintained by the provider in this State. The 20listing shall also include the monthly assessment amounts owed 21for each hospital and any unpaid assessment liability greater 22than 90 days delinquent. The Illinois Department shall 23administer and enforce this Article and collect the 24assessments and penalty assessments imposed under this Article 25using procedures employed in its administration of this Code   HB2771 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1generally. The Illinois Department, its Director, and every 2hospital provider subject to assessment under this Article 3shall have the following powers, duties, and rights:4        (1) The Illinois Department may initiate either 5    administrative or judicial proceedings, or both, to 6    enforce provisions of this Article. Administrative 7    enforcement proceedings initiated hereunder shall be 8    governed by the Illinois Department's administrative 9    rules. Judicial enforcement proceedings initiated 10    hereunder shall be governed by the rules of procedure 11    applicable in the courts of this State.12        (2) (Blank). No proceedings for collection, refund, 13    credit, or other adjustment of an assessment amount shall 14    be issued more than 3 years after the due date of the 15    assessment, except in the case of an extended period 16    agreed to in writing by the Illinois Department and the 17    hospital provider before the expiration of this limitation 18    period.19        (3) Any unpaid assessment under this Article shall 20    become a lien upon the assets of the hospital upon which it 21    was assessed. If any hospital provider, outside the usual 22    course of its business, sells or transfers the major part 23    of any one or more of (A) the real property and 24    improvements, (B) the machinery and equipment, or (C) the 25    furniture or fixtures, of any hospital that is subject to 26    the provisions of this Article, the seller or transferor   HB2771 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    shall pay the Illinois Department the amount of any 2    assessment, assessment penalty, and interest (if any) due 3    from it under this Article up to the date of the sale or 4    transfer. The Illinois Department may, in its discretion, 5    foreclose on such a lien, but shall do so in a manner that 6    is consistent with Section 5e of the Retailers' Occupation 7    Tax Act. If the seller or transferor fails to pay any 8    assessment, assessment penalty, and interest (if any) due, 9    the purchaser or transferee of such asset shall be liable 10    for the amount of the assessment, penalties, and interest 11    (if any) up to the amount of the reasonable value of the 12    property acquired by the purchaser or transferee. The 13    purchaser or transferee shall continue to be liable until 14    the purchaser or transferee pays the full amount of the 15    assessment, penalties, and interest (if any) up to the 16    amount of the reasonable value of the property acquired by 17    the purchaser or transferee or until the purchaser or 18    transferee receives from the Illinois Department a 19    certificate showing that such assessment, penalty, and 20    interest have been paid or a certificate from the Illinois 21    Department showing that no assessment, penalty, or 22    interest is due from the seller or transferor under this 23    Article.24        (4) Payments under this Article are not subject to the 25    Illinois Prompt Payment Act. Credits or refunds shall not 26    bear interest.  HB2771 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    (b) In addition to any other remedy provided for and 2without sending a notice of assessment liability, the Illinois 3Department shall may collect an unpaid assessment by 4withholding, as payment of the assessment, reimbursements or 5other amounts otherwise payable by the Illinois Department to 6the hospital provider, including, but not limited to, payment 7amounts otherwise payable from a managed care organization 8performing duties under contract with the Illinois Department. 9        (1) The requirements of this subsection may be waived 10    in instances when a disaster proclamation has been 11    declared by the Governor. In such circumstances, a 12    hospital must demonstrate temporary financial distress and 13    establish an agreement with the Illinois Department 14    specifying when repayment in full of all taxes owed will 15    occur.16        (2) The requirements of this subsection may be waived 17    by the Illinois Department in instances when a hospital 18    has entered into and remains in compliance with a 19    repayment plan or a tax deferral plan. A repayment plan or 20    tax deferral plan must be entered into no later than 30 21    days after notice of an unpaid assessment payment. No 22    repayment plan may exceed a period of 36 months. No tax 23    deferral plan may exceed a period of 6 months, and 24    repayment after the end of a tax deferral plan shall not 25    exceed 36 months. Failure to remain in compliance with a 26    repayment plan or tax deferral plan shall cause immediate   HB2771 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    termination of such plan unless there is prior written 2    consent from the Illinois Department for a period of 3    non-compliance.4        (3) Beginning September 1, 2025, the Illinois 5    Department shall immediately collect all overdue unpaid 6    assessments and penalties through the collection methods 7    authorized under this Section, unless a repayment plan or 8    tax deferral plan has already been agreed to by September 9    1, 2025. 10    (c) To provide for the expeditious and timely 11implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 12amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 13may adopt emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 14Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of 15emergency rules is deemed to be necessary for the public 16interest, safety, and welfare. 17(Source: P.A. 93-659, eff. 2-3-04; 93-841, eff. 7-30-04; 1894-242, eff. 7-18-05.) 19    (305 ILCS 5/5A-8)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5A-8)20    Sec. 5A-8. Hospital Provider Fund. 21    (a) There is created in the State Treasury the Hospital 22Provider Fund. Interest earned by the Fund shall be credited 23to the Fund. The Fund shall not be used to replace any moneys 24appropriated to the Medicaid program by the General Assembly. 25    (b) The Fund is created for the purpose of receiving   HB2771 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1moneys in accordance with Section 5A-6 and disbursing moneys 2only for the following purposes, notwithstanding any other 3provision of law: 4        (1) For making payments to hospitals as required under 5    this Code, under the Children's Health Insurance Program 6    Act, under the Covering ALL KIDS Health Insurance Act, and 7    under the Long Term Acute Care Hospital Quality 8    Improvement Transfer Program Act. 9        (2) For the reimbursement of moneys collected by the 10    Illinois Department from hospitals or hospital providers 11    through error or mistake in performing the activities 12    authorized under this Code. 13        (3) For payment of administrative expenses incurred by 14    the Illinois Department or its agent in performing 15    activities under this Code, under the Children's Health 16    Insurance Program Act, under the Covering ALL KIDS Health 17    Insurance Act, and under the Long Term Acute Care Hospital 18    Quality Improvement Transfer Program Act. 19        (4) For payments of any amounts which are reimbursable 20    to the federal government for payments from this Fund 21    which are required to be paid by State warrant. 22        (5) For making transfers, as those transfers are 23    authorized in the proceedings authorizing debt under the 24    Short Term Borrowing Act, but transfers made under this 25    paragraph (5) shall not exceed the principal amount of 26    debt issued in anticipation of the receipt by the State of   HB2771 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    moneys to be deposited into the Fund. 2        (6) For making transfers to any other fund in the 3    State treasury, but transfers made under this paragraph 4    (6) shall not exceed the amount transferred previously 5    from that other fund into the Hospital Provider Fund plus 6    any interest that would have been earned by that fund on 7    the monies that had been transferred. 8        (6.5) For making transfers to the Healthcare Provider 9    Relief Fund, except that transfers made under this 10    paragraph (6.5) shall not exceed $60,000,000 in the 11    aggregate. 12        (7) For making transfers not exceeding the following 13    amounts, related to State fiscal years 2013 through 2018, 14    to the following designated funds:15            Health and Human Services Medicaid Trust16                Fund..............................$20,000,00017            Long-Term Care Provider Fund..........$30,000,00018            General Revenue Fund.................$80,000,000.19    Transfers under this paragraph shall be made within 7 days 20    after the payments have been received pursuant to the 21    schedule of payments provided in subsection (a) of Section 22    5A-4.23        (7.1) (Blank).24        (7.5) (Blank).25        (7.8) (Blank).26        (7.9) (Blank).  HB2771 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        (7.10) For State fiscal year 2014, for making 2    transfers of the moneys resulting from the assessment 3    under subsection (b-5) of Section 5A-2 and received from 4    hospital providers under Section 5A-4 and transferred into 5    the Hospital Provider Fund under Section 5A-6 to the 6    designated funds not exceeding the following amounts in 7    that State fiscal year:8            Healthcare Provider Relief Fund......$100,000,0009        Transfers under this paragraph shall be made within 7 10    days after the payments have been received pursuant to the 11    schedule of payments provided in subsection (a) of Section 12    5A-4. 13        The additional amount of transfers in this paragraph 14    (7.10), authorized by Public Act 98-651, shall be made 15    within 10 State business days after June 16, 2014 (the 16    effective date of Public Act 98-651). That authority shall 17    remain in effect even if Public Act 98-651 does not become 18    law until State fiscal year 2015.19        (7.10a) For State fiscal years 2015 through 2018, for 20    making transfers of the moneys resulting from the 21    assessment under subsection (b-5) of Section 5A-2 and 22    received from hospital providers under Section 5A-4 and 23    transferred into the Hospital Provider Fund under Section 24    5A-6 to the designated funds not exceeding the following 25    amounts related to each State fiscal year: 26            Healthcare Provider Relief Fund......$50,000,000   HB2771 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        Transfers under this paragraph shall be made within 7 2    days after the payments have been received pursuant to the 3    schedule of payments provided in subsection (a) of Section 4    5A-4. 5        (7.11) (Blank). 6        (7.12) For State fiscal year 2013, for increasing by 7    21/365ths the transfer of the moneys resulting from the 8    assessment under subsection (b-5) of Section 5A-2 and 9    received from hospital providers under Section 5A-4 for 10    the portion of State fiscal year 2012 beginning June 10, 11    2012 through June 30, 2012 and transferred into the 12    Hospital Provider Fund under Section 5A-6 to the 13    designated funds not exceeding the following amounts in 14    that State fiscal year: 15            Healthcare Provider Relief Fund.......$2,870,000 16        Since the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 17    Services approval of the assessment authorized under 18    subsection (b-5) of Section 5A-2, received from hospital 19    providers under Section 5A-4 and the payment methodologies 20    to hospitals required under Section 5A-12.4 was not 21    received by the Department until State fiscal year 2014 22    and since the Department made retroactive payments during 23    State fiscal year 2014 related to the referenced period of 24    June 2012, the transfer authority granted in this 25    paragraph (7.12) is extended through the date that is 10 26    State business days after June 16, 2014 (the effective   HB2771 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    date of Public Act 98-651). 2        (7.13) In addition to any other transfers authorized 3    under this Section, for State fiscal years 2017 and 2018, 4    for making transfers to the Healthcare Provider Relief 5    Fund of moneys collected from the ACA Assessment 6    Adjustment authorized under subsections (a) and (b-5) of 7    Section 5A-2 and paid by hospital providers under Section 8    5A-4 into the Hospital Provider Fund under Section 5A-6 9    for each State fiscal year. Timing of transfers to the 10    Healthcare Provider Relief Fund under this paragraph shall 11    be at the discretion of the Department, but no less 12    frequently than quarterly.13        (7.14) For making transfers not exceeding the 14    following amounts, related to State fiscal years 2019 and 15    2020, to the following designated funds:16            Health and Human Services Medicaid Trust17                Fund..............................$20,000,00018            Long-Term Care Provider Fund..........$30,000,00019            Healthcare Provider Relief Fund.....$325,000,000.20        Transfers under this paragraph shall be made within 7 21    days after the payments have been received pursuant to the 22    schedule of payments provided in subsection (a) of Section 23    5A-4. 24        (7.15) For making transfers not exceeding the 25    following amounts, related to State fiscal years 2023 26    through 2024 2026, to the following designated funds:   HB2771 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1            Health and Human Services Medicaid Trust 2                Fund.............................$20,000,000 3            Long-Term Care Provider Fund.........$30,000,000 4            Healthcare Provider Relief Fund.....$365,000,000 5        (7.16) For making transfers not exceeding the 6    following amounts, related to July 1, 2024 2026 to 7    December 31, 2024 2026, to the following designated funds: 8            Health and Human Services Medicaid Trust 9                Fund.............................$10,000,000 10            Long-Term Care Provider Fund.........$15,000,000 11            Healthcare Provider Relief Fund.....$182,500,000 12        (7.17) For making transfers not exceeding the 13    following amounts, related to calendar years 2025 and each 14    calendar year thereafter, the following designated funds:15            Health and Human Services Medicaid Trust16                Fund..............................$20,000,00017            Long-Term Care Provider Fund..........$30,000,00018            Healthcare Provider Relief Fund....$505,637,082; 19        however the amount shall remain $365,000,000 until the 20        reimbursement rates described in subsection (r) of Section 21        5A-12.7 are fully implemented. If for any reason the 22        assessment imposed by subsection (a) or (b-5) of Section 5A-2 23        is reduced, the amount of $505,637,082 shall be reduced by the 24        same percentage. 25    To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation 26of the changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act   HB2771 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1of the 104th General Assembly, the Department may adopt 2emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 3Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of emergency rules 4is deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 5welfare. 6        (8) For making refunds to hospital providers pursuant 7    to Section 5A-10. 8        (9) For making payment to capitated managed care 9    organizations as described in subsections (s) and (t) of 10    Section 5A-12.2, subsection (r) of Section 5A-12.6, and 11    Section 5A-12.7 of this Code. 12    Disbursements from the Fund, other than transfers 13authorized under paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection, 14shall be by warrants drawn by the State Comptroller upon 15receipt of vouchers duly executed and certified by the 16Illinois Department. 17    (c) The Fund shall consist of the following: 18        (1) All moneys collected or received by the Illinois 19    Department from the hospital provider assessment imposed 20    by this Article. 21        (2) All federal matching funds received by the 22    Illinois Department as a result of expenditures made by 23    the Illinois Department that are attributable to moneys 24    deposited in the Fund. 25        (3) Any interest or penalty levied in conjunction with 26    the administration of this Article.   HB2771 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        (3.5) As applicable, proceeds from surety bond 2    payments payable to the Department as referenced in 3    subsection (s) of Section 5A-12.2 of this Code. 4        (4) Moneys transferred from another fund in the State 5    treasury. 6        (5) All other moneys received for the Fund from any 7    other source, including interest earned thereon. 8    (d) (Blank). 9(Source: P.A. 101-650, eff. 7-7-20; 102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 10    (305 ILCS 5/5A-10)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5A-10)11    Sec. 5A-10. Applicability. 12    (a) The assessment imposed by subsection (a) of Section 135A-2 shall cease to be imposed and the Department's obligation 14to make payments shall immediately cease, and any moneys 15remaining in the Fund shall be refunded to hospital providers 16in proportion to the amounts paid by them, if:17        (1) The payments to hospitals required under this 18    Article are not eligible for federal matching funds under 19    Title XIX or XXI of the Social Security Act;20        (2) For State fiscal years 2009 through 2018, and as 21    provided in Section 5A-16, the Department of Healthcare 22    and Family Services adopts any administrative rule change 23    to reduce payment rates or alters any payment methodology 24    that reduces any payment rates made to operating hospitals 25    under the approved Title XIX or Title XXI State plan in   HB2771 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    effect January 1, 2008 except for:2            (A) any changes for hospitals described in 3        subsection (b) of Section 5A-3;4            (B) any rates for payments made under this Article 5        V-A; 6            (C) any changes proposed in State plan amendment 7        transmittal numbers 08-01, 08-02, 08-04, 08-06, and 8        08-07;9            (D) in relation to any admissions on or after 10        January 1, 2011, a modification in the methodology for 11        calculating outlier payments to hospitals for 12        exceptionally costly stays, for hospitals reimbursed 13        under the diagnosis-related grouping methodology in 14        effect on July 1, 2011; provided that the Department 15        shall be limited to one such modification during the 16        36-month period after the effective date of this 17        amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly; 18            (E) any changes affecting hospitals authorized by 19        Public Act 97-689; 20            (F) any changes authorized by Section 14-12 of 21        this Code, or for any changes authorized under Section 22        5A-15 of this Code; or 23            (G) any changes authorized under Section 5-5b.1. 24    (b) The assessment imposed by Section 5A-2 shall not take 25effect or shall cease to be imposed, and the Department's 26obligation to make payments shall immediately cease, if the   HB2771 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1assessment is determined to be an impermissible tax under 2Title XIX of the Social Security Act. Moneys in the Hospital 3Provider Fund derived from assessments imposed prior thereto 4shall be disbursed in accordance with Section 5A-8 to the 5extent federal financial participation is not reduced due to 6the impermissibility of the assessments, and any remaining 7moneys shall be refunded to hospital providers in proportion 8to the amounts paid by them. 9    (c) The assessments imposed by subsection (b-5) of Section 105A-2 shall not take effect or shall cease to be imposed, the 11Department's obligation to make payments shall immediately 12cease, and any moneys remaining in the Fund shall be refunded 13to hospital providers in proportion to the amounts paid by 14them, if the payments to hospitals required under Section 155A-12.4 or Section 5A-12.6 are not eligible for federal 16matching funds under Title XIX of the Social Security Act.17    (d) The assessments imposed by Section 5A-2 shall not take 18effect or shall cease to be imposed, the Department's 19obligation to make payments shall immediately cease, and any 20moneys remaining in the Fund shall be refunded to hospital 21providers in proportion to the amounts paid by them, if: 22        (1) for State fiscal years 2013 through 2018, and as 23    provided in Section 5A-16, the Department reduces any 24    payment rates to hospitals as in effect on May 1, 2012, or 25    alters any payment methodology as in effect on May 1, 26    2012, that has the effect of reducing payment rates to   HB2771 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    hospitals, except for any changes affecting hospitals 2    authorized in Public Act 97-689 and any changes authorized 3    by Section 14-12 of this Code, and except for any changes 4    authorized under Section 5A-15, and except for any changes 5    authorized under Section 5-5b.1;6        (2) for State fiscal years 2013 through 2018, and as 7    provided in Section 5A-16, the Department reduces any 8    supplemental payments made to hospitals below the amounts 9    paid for services provided in State fiscal year 2011 as 10    implemented by administrative rules adopted and in effect 11    on or prior to June 30, 2011, except for any changes 12    affecting hospitals authorized in Public Act 97-689 and 13    any changes authorized by Section 14-12 of this Code, and 14    except for any changes authorized under Section 5A-15, and 15    except for any changes authorized under Section 5-5b.1; or16        (3) for State fiscal years 2015 through 2018, and as 17    provided in Section 5A-16, the Department reduces the 18    overall effective rate of reimbursement to hospitals below 19    the level authorized under Section 14-12 of this Code, 20    except for any changes under Section 14-12 or Section 21    5A-15 of this Code, and except for any changes authorized 22    under Section 5-5b.1. 23    (e) In State fiscal year 2019 through State fiscal year 242020, the assessments imposed under Section 5A-2 shall not 25take effect or shall cease to be imposed, the Department's 26obligation to make payments shall immediately cease, and any   HB2771 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1moneys remaining in the Fund shall be refunded to hospital 2providers in proportion to the amounts paid by them, if:3        (1) the payments to hospitals required under Section 4    5A-12.6 are not eligible for federal matching funds under 5    Title XIX of the Social Security Act; or6        (2) the Department reduces the overall effective rate 7    of reimbursement to hospitals below the level authorized 8    under Section 14-12 of this Code, as in effect on December 9    31, 2017, except for any changes authorized under Sections 10    14-12 or Section 5A-15 of this Code, and except for any 11    changes authorized under changes to Sections 5A-12.2, 12    5A-12.4, 5A-12.5, 5A-12.6, and 14-12 made by Public Act 13    100-581. 14    (f) Beginning in State Fiscal Year 2021 through December 1531, 2024, the assessments imposed under Section 5A-2 shall not 16take effect or shall cease to be imposed, the Department's 17obligation to make payments shall immediately cease, and any 18moneys remaining in the Fund shall be refunded to hospital 19providers in proportion to the amounts paid by them, if:20        (1) the payments to hospitals required under Section 21    5A-12.7 are not eligible for federal matching funds under 22    Title XIX of the Social Security Act; or 23        (2) the Department reduces the overall effective rate 24    of reimbursement to hospitals below the level authorized 25    under Section 14-12, as in effect on December 31, 2021, 26    except for any changes authorized under Sections 14-12 or   HB2771 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    5A-15, and except for any changes authorized under changes 2    to Sections 5A-12.7 and 14-12 made by this amendatory Act 3    of the 101st General Assembly, and except for any changes 4    to Section 5A-12.7 made by this amendatory Act of the 5    102nd General Assembly. 6    (g) Beginning January 1, 2025, the assessments imposed 7under Section 5A-2 shall not take effect or shall cease to be 8imposed, if:9        (1) the payments to hospitals required under Section 10    5A-12.7 are not eligible for federal matching funds under 11    Title XIX of the Social Security Act; or12        (2) the Department reduces the rates of reimbursement 13    below the rates in effect December 31, 2024, resulting in 14    an aggregate reduction below the levels of reimbursement 15    for the 12-month period ending 6 months prior to the 16    effective date of the proposed new rates. 17    (h) To provide for the expeditious and timely 18implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 20may adopt emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 21Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of 22emergency rules is deemed to be necessary for the public 23interest, safety, and welfare. 24(Source: P.A. 101-650, eff. 7-7-20; 102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 25    (305 ILCS 5/5A-12.7)  HB2771 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)2    Sec. 5A-12.7. Continuation of hospital access payments on 3and after July 1, 2020.4    (a) To preserve and improve access to hospital services, 5for hospital services rendered on and after July 1, 2020, the 6Department shall, except for hospitals described in subsection 7(b) of Section 5A-3, make payments to hospitals or require 8capitated managed care organizations to make payments as set 9forth in this Section. Payments under this Section are not due 10and payable, however, until: (i) the methodologies described 11in this Section are approved by the federal government in an 12appropriate State Plan amendment or directed payment preprint; 13and (ii) the assessment imposed under this Article is 14determined to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the 15Social Security Act. In determining the hospital access 16payments authorized under subsection (g) of this Section, if a 17hospital ceases to qualify for payments from the pool, the 18payments for all hospitals continuing to qualify for payments 19from such pool shall be uniformly adjusted to fully expend the 20aggregate net amount of the pool, with such adjustment being 21effective on the first day of the second month following the 22date the hospital ceases to receive payments from such pool.23    (b) Amounts moved into claims-based rates and distributed 24in accordance with Section 14-12 shall remain in those 25claims-based rates.26    (c) Graduate medical education.  HB2771 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        (1) The calculation of graduate medical education 2    payments shall be based on the hospital's Medicare cost 3    report ending in Calendar Year 2018, as reported in the 4    Healthcare Cost Report Information System file, release 5    date September 30, 2019. An Illinois hospital reporting 6    intern and resident cost on its Medicare cost report shall 7    be eligible for graduate medical education payments.8        (2) Each hospital's annualized Medicaid Intern 9    Resident Cost is calculated using annualized intern and 10    resident total costs obtained from Worksheet B Part I, 11    Columns 21 and 22 the sum of Lines 30-43, 50-76, 90-93, 12    96-98, and 105-112 multiplied by the percentage that the 13    hospital's Medicaid days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, 14    Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, and 32) comprise of the 15    hospital's total days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 8, 16    Lines 14, 16-18, and 32).17        (3) An annualized Medicaid indirect medical education 18    (IME) payment is calculated for each hospital using its 19    IME payments (Worksheet E Part A, Line 29, Column 1) 20    multiplied by the percentage that its Medicaid days 21    (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, 22    and 32) comprise of its Medicare days (Worksheet S3 Part 23    I, Column 6, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, and 16-18).24        (4) For each hospital, its annualized Medicaid Intern 25    Resident Cost and its annualized Medicaid IME payment are 26    summed, and, except as capped at 120% of the average cost   HB2771 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    per intern and resident for all qualifying hospitals as 2    calculated under this paragraph, is multiplied by the 3    applicable reimbursement factor as described in this 4    paragraph, to determine the hospital's final graduate 5    medical education payment. Each hospital's average cost 6    per intern and resident shall be calculated by summing its 7    total annualized Medicaid Intern Resident Cost plus its 8    annualized Medicaid IME payment and dividing that amount 9    by the hospital's total Full Time Equivalent Residents and 10    Interns. If the hospital's average per intern and resident 11    cost is greater than 120% of the same calculation for all 12    qualifying hospitals, the hospital's per intern and 13    resident cost shall be capped at 120% of the average cost 14    for all qualifying hospitals.15            (A) For the period of July 1, 2020 through 16        December 31, 2022, the applicable reimbursement factor 17        shall be 22.6%. 18            (B) Beginning For the period of January 1, 2023 19        through December 31, 2026, the applicable 20        reimbursement factor shall be 35% for all qualified 21        safety-net hospitals, as defined in Section 5-5e.1 of 22        this Code, and all hospitals with 100 or more Full Time 23        Equivalent Residents and Interns, as reported on the 24        hospital's Medicare cost report ending in Calendar 25        Year 2018, and for all other qualified hospitals the 26        applicable reimbursement factor shall be 30%.   HB2771 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    (d) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. For the period 2of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, each Illinois 3hospital shall receive an annual payment equal to the amounts 4below, to be paid in 12 equal installments on or before the 5seventh State business day of each month, except that no 6payment shall be due within 30 days after the later of the date 7of notification of federal approval of the payment 8methodologies required under this Section or any waiver 9required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which time the sum of amounts 10required under this Section prior to the date of notification 11is due and payable.12        (1) For critical access hospitals, $385 per covered 13    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 14    $530 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates 15    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 16    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.17        (2) For safety-net hospitals, $960 per covered 18    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 19    $625 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates 20    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 21    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.22        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $295 per 23    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 24    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 25    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.26        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $125 per   HB2771 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 2    claims and $130 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 3    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 4    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.5        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $355 6    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 7    fee-for-service claims for dates of service in Calendar 8    Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as 9    of May 11, 2020.10        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 11    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $350 per 12    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 13    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 14    $620 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 15    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.16        (7) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 17    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as 18    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 19    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional 20    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 21    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 22    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 23    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an 24    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 25    of the qualifying hospital's State Fiscal Year 2018 total 26    inpatient fee-for-service days multiplied by the   HB2771 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $226.30 for 2    hospitals located in Cook County and $116.21 for hospitals 3    located outside Cook County.4    (d-2) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. Beginning 5January 1, 2023, each Illinois hospital shall receive an 6annual payment equal to the amounts listed below, to be paid in 712 equal installments on or before the seventh State business 8day of each month, except that no payment shall be due within 930 days after the later of the date of notification of federal 10approval of the payment methodologies required under this 11Section or any waiver required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which 12time the sum of amounts required under this Section prior to 13the date of notification is due and payable. The Department 14may adjust the rates in paragraphs (1) through (7) to comply 15with the federal upper payment limits, with such adjustments 16being determined so that the total estimated spending by 17hospital class, under such adjusted rates, remains 18substantially similar to the total estimated spending under 19the original rates set forth in this subsection. 20        (1) For critical access hospitals, as defined in 21    subsection (f), $750 per covered inpatient day contained 22    in paid fee-for-service claims and $750 per paid 23    fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates of service in 24    Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data 25    Warehouse as of August 6, 2021.26        (2) For safety-net hospitals, as described in   HB2771 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    subsection (f), $1,350 per inpatient day contained in paid 2    fee-for-service claims and $1,350 per paid fee-for-service 3    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 4    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 5    August 6, 2021.6        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $550 per 7    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 8    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 9    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 10    2021.11        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $200 per 12    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 13    claims and $200 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 14    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 15    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 16    2021.17        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $550 18    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 19    fee-for-service claims and $125 per paid fee-for-service 20    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 21    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 22    August 6, 2021.23        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 24    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $500 per 25    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 26    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and   HB2771 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    $500 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 2    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 3    2021.4        (7) For public hospitals, as defined in subsection 5    (f), $275 per covered inpatient day contained in paid 6    fee-for-service claims and $275 per paid fee-for-service 7    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 8    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 9    August 6, 2021.10        (8) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 11    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as 12    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 13    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional 14    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 15    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 16    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 17    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an 18    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 19    of the qualifying hospital's Calendar Year 2019 total 20    inpatient fee-for-service days, in the Department's 21    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 2021, multiplied 22    by the applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $244.37 23    for hospitals located in Cook County and $312.03 for 24    hospitals located outside Cook County.25    (e) The Department shall require managed care 26organizations (MCOs) to make directed payments and   HB2771 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1pass-through payments according to this Section. Each calendar 2year, the Department shall require MCOs to pay the maximum 3amount out of these funds as allowed as pass-through payments 4under federal regulations. The Department shall require MCOs 5to make such pass-through payments as specified in this 6Section. The Department shall require the MCOs to pay the 7remaining amounts as directed Payments as specified in this 8Section. The Department shall issue payments to the 9Comptroller by the seventh business day of each month for all 10MCOs that are sufficient for MCOs to make the directed 11payments and pass-through payments according to this Section. 12The Department shall require the MCOs to make pass-through 13payments and directed payments using electronic funds 14transfers (EFT), if the hospital provides the information 15necessary to process such EFTs, in accordance with directions 16provided monthly by the Department, within 7 business days of 17the date the funds are paid to the MCOs, as indicated by the 18"Paid Date" on the website of the Office of the Comptroller if 19the funds are paid by EFT and the MCOs have received directed 20payment instructions. If funds are not paid through the 21Comptroller by EFT, payment must be made within 7 business 22days of the date actually received by the MCO. The MCO will be 23considered to have paid the pass-through payments when the 24payment remittance number is generated or the date the MCO 25sends the check to the hospital, if EFT information is not 26supplied. If an MCO is late in paying a pass-through payment or   HB2771 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1directed payment as required under this Section (including any 2extensions granted by the Department), it shall pay a penalty, 3unless waived by the Department for reasonable cause, to the 4Department equal to 5% of the amount of the pass-through 5payment or directed payment not paid on or before the due date 6plus 5% of the portion thereof remaining unpaid on the last day 7of each 30-day period thereafter. Payments to MCOs that would 8be paid consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment 9in the absence of the increased capitation payments under this 10Section shall not be reduced as a consequence of payments made 11under this subsection. The Department shall publish and 12maintain on its website for a period of no less than 8 calendar 13quarters, the quarterly calculation of directed payments and 14pass-through payments owed to each hospital from each MCO. All 15calculations and reports shall be posted no later than the 16first day of the quarter for which the payments are to be 17issued.18    (f)(1) For purposes of allocating the funds included in 19capitation payments to MCOs, Illinois hospitals shall be 20divided into the following classes as defined in 21administrative rules:22        (A) Beginning July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, 23    critical access hospitals. Beginning January 1, 2023, 24    "critical access hospital" means a hospital designated by 25    the Department of Public Health as a critical access 26    hospital, excluding any hospital meeting the definition of   HB2771 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    a public hospital in subparagraph (F). 2        (B) Safety-net hospitals, except that stand-alone 3    children's hospitals that are not specialty children's 4    hospitals, safety-net hospitals that elect not to be 5    included as provided in item (i), and, for calendar years 6    2025 and 2026 only, hospitals with over 9,000 Medicaid 7    acute care inpatient admissions per calendar year, 8    excluding admissions for Medicare-Medicaid dual eligible 9    patients, will not be included. For the calendar year 10    beginning January 1, 2023, and each calendar year 11    thereafter, assignment to the safety-net class shall be 12    based on the annual safety-net rate year beginning 15 13    months before the beginning of the first Payout Quarter of 14    the calendar year. 15            (i) Beginning calendar year 2026, all hospitals 16        qualifying as a safety-net hospital under subsection 17        (a) of Section 5-5e.1 for rates years beginning on and 18        after October 1, 2024 shall be permitted to elect to 19        remain in the high Medicaid hospital class as defined 20        in subparagraph (G) for purposes of the State directed 21        payments described in subsection (r) instead of being 22        assigned to the safety-net fixed pool directed 23        payments class as described in subsection (g).24            (ii) If a hospital elects assignment in the high 25        Medicaid hospital class as defined in subparagraph 26        (G), the hospital must remain in the high Medicaid   HB2771 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        hospital class for the entire calendar year. 2        (C) Long term acute care hospitals.3        (D) Freestanding psychiatric hospitals.4        (E) Freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.5        (F) Beginning January 1, 2023, "public hospital" means 6    a hospital that is owned or operated by an Illinois 7    Government body or municipality, excluding a hospital 8    provider that is a State agency, a State university, or a 9    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more. 10        (G) High Medicaid hospitals. 11            (i) As used in this Section, "high Medicaid 12        hospital" means a general acute care hospital that:13                (I) For the payout periods July 1, 2020 14            through December 31, 2022, is not a safety-net 15            hospital or critical access hospital and that has 16            a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate above 30% or 17            a hospital that had over 35,000 inpatient Medicaid 18            days during the applicable period. For the period 19            July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, the 20            applicable period for the Medicaid Inpatient 21            Utilization Rate (MIUR) is the rate year 2020 MIUR 22            and for the number of inpatient days it is State 23            fiscal year 2018. Beginning in calendar year 2021, 24            the Department shall use the most recently 25            determined MIUR, as defined in subsection (h) of 26            Section 5-5.02, and for the inpatient day   HB2771 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1            threshold, the State fiscal year ending 18 months 2            prior to the beginning of the calendar year. For 3            purposes of calculating MIUR under this Section, 4            children's hospitals and affiliated general acute 5            care hospitals shall be considered a single 6            hospital.7                (II) For the calendar year beginning January 8            1, 2023, and each calendar year thereafter, is not 9            a public hospital, safety-net hospital, or 10            critical access hospital and that qualifies as a 11            regional high volume hospital or is a hospital 12            that has a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate 13            (MIUR) above 30%. As used in this item, "regional 14            high volume hospital" means a hospital which ranks 15            in the top 2 quartiles based on total hospital 16            services volume, of all eligible general acute 17            care hospitals, when ranked in descending order 18            based on total hospital services volume, within 19            the same Medicaid managed care region, as 20            designated by the Department, as of January 1, 21            2022. As used in this item, "total hospital 22            services volume" means the total of all Medical 23            Assistance hospital inpatient admissions plus all 24            Medical Assistance hospital outpatient visits. For 25            purposes of determining regional high volume 26            hospital inpatient admissions and outpatient   HB2771 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1            visits, the Department shall use dates of service 2            provided during State Fiscal Year 2020 for the 3            Payout Quarter beginning January 1, 2023. The 4            Department shall use dates of service from the 5            State fiscal year ending 18 month before the 6            beginning of the first Payout Quarter of the 7            subsequent annual determination period. 8            (ii) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 9        2023, the Department shall use the Rate Year 2022 10        Medicaid inpatient utilization rate (MIUR), as defined 11        in subsection (h) of Section 5-5.02. For each 12        subsequent annual determination, the Department shall 13        use the MIUR applicable to the rate year ending 14        September 30 of the year preceding the beginning of 15        the calendar year. 16        (H) General acute care hospitals. As used under this 17    Section, "general acute care hospitals" means all other 18    Illinois hospitals not identified in subparagraphs (A) 19    through (G).20    (2) Hospitals' qualification for each class shall be 21assessed prior to the beginning of each calendar year and the 22new class designation shall be effective January 1 of the next 23year. The Department shall publish by rule the process for 24establishing class determination.25    (3) Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department may reassign 26hospitals or entire hospital classes as defined above, if   HB2771 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1federal limits on the payments to the class to which the 2hospitals are assigned based on the criteria in this 3subsection prevent the Department from making payments to the 4class that would otherwise be due under this Section. The 5Department shall publish the criteria and composition of each 6new class based on the reassignments, and the projected impact 7on payments to each hospital under the new classes on its 8website by November 15 of the year before the year in which the 9class changes become effective. 10    (g) Fixed pool directed payments. Beginning July 1, 2020, 11the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 12used to issue directed payments to qualified Illinois 13safety-net hospitals and critical access hospitals on a 14monthly basis in accordance with this subsection. Prior to the 15beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 16Department shall use encounter claims data from the 17Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 18Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 19services rendered by safety-net hospitals and critical access 20hospitals to determine a quarterly uniform per unit add-on for 21each hospital class.22        (1) Inpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform per 23    diem add-on shall be derived by dividing the quarterly 24    Inpatient Directed Payments Pool amount allocated to the 25    applicable hospital class by the total inpatient days 26    contained on all encounter claims received during the   HB2771 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.2            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a 3        quarterly inpatient directed payment calculated that 4        is equal to the product of the number of inpatient days 5        attributable to the hospital used in the calculation 6        of the quarterly uniform class per diem add-on, 7        multiplied by the calculated applicable quarterly 8        uniform class per diem add-on of the hospital class.9            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 10        quarterly inpatient directed payment in each of the 3 11        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 12        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.13        (2) Outpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform 14    per claim add-on shall be derived by dividing the 15    quarterly Outpatient Directed Payments Pool amount 16    allocated to the applicable hospital class by the total 17    outpatient encounter claims received during the 18    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.19            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a 20        quarterly outpatient directed payment calculated that 21        is equal to the product of the number of outpatient 22        encounter claims attributable to the hospital used in 23        the calculation of the quarterly uniform class per 24        claim add-on, multiplied by the calculated applicable 25        quarterly uniform class per claim add-on of the 26        hospital class.  HB2771 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 2        quarterly outpatient directed payment in each of the 3 3        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 4        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.5        (3) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 6    Directed Payment as identified by the Department on its 7    quarterly determination report.8        (4) Definitions. As used in this subsection:9            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each 3 month calendar 10        quarter, beginning July 1, 2020.11            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each 3 month 12        calendar quarter, which ends 3 months prior to the 13        first day of each Payout Quarter.14        (5) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, 15    the following amounts shall be allocated to the following 16    hospital class directed payment pools for the quarterly 17    development of a uniform per unit add-on:18            (A) $2,894,500 for hospital inpatient services for 19        critical access hospitals.20            (B) $4,294,374 for hospital outpatient services 21        for critical access hospitals.22            (C) $29,109,330 for hospital inpatient services 23        for safety-net hospitals.24            (D) $35,041,218 for hospital outpatient services 25        for safety-net hospitals.26        (6) For the period January 1, 2023 through December   HB2771 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    31, 2023, the Department shall establish the amounts that 2    shall be allocated to the hospital class directed payment 3    fixed pools identified in this paragraph for the quarterly 4    development of a uniform per unit add-on. The Department 5    shall establish such amounts so that the total amount of 6    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 7    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 8    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 9    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 10    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 11    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 12    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 13    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 14    payment fixed pool amounts to be established under this 15    paragraph on its website by November 15, 2022. 16            (A) Hospital inpatient services for critical 17        access hospitals.18            (B) Hospital outpatient services for critical 19        access hospitals.20            (C) Hospital inpatient services for public 21        hospitals.22            (D) Hospital outpatient services for public 23        hospitals.24            (E) Hospital inpatient services for safety-net 25        hospitals.26            (F) Hospital outpatient services for safety-net   HB2771 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        hospitals.2        (7) Semi-annual rate maintenance review. The 3    Department shall ensure that hospitals assigned to the 4    fixed pools in paragraph (6) are paid no less than 95% of 5    the annual initial rate for each 6-month period of each 6    annual payout period. For each calendar year, the 7    Department shall calculate the annual initial rate per day 8    and per visit for each fixed pool hospital class listed in 9    paragraph (6), by dividing the total of all applicable 10    inpatient or outpatient directed payments issued in the 11    preceding calendar year to the hospitals in each fixed 12    pool class for the calendar year, plus any increase 13    resulting from the annual adjustments described in 14    subsection (i), by the actual applicable total service 15    units for the preceding calendar year which were the basis 16    of the total applicable inpatient or outpatient directed 17    payments issued to the hospitals in each fixed pool class 18    in the calendar year, except that for calendar year 2023, 19    the service units from calendar year 2021 shall be used. 20            (A) The Department shall calculate the effective 21        rate, per day and per visit, for the payout periods of 22        January to June and July to December of each year, for 23        each fixed pool listed in paragraph (6), by dividing 24        50% of the annual pool by the total applicable 25        reported service units for the 2 applicable 26        determination quarters.  HB2771 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1            (B) If the effective rate calculated in 2        subparagraph (A) is less than 95% of the annual 3        initial rate assigned to the class for each pool under 4        paragraph (6), the Department shall adjust the payment 5        for each hospital to a level equal to no less than 95% 6        of the annual initial rate, by issuing a retroactive 7        adjustment payment for the 6-month period under review 8        as identified in subparagraph (A). 9    (h) Fixed rate directed payments. Effective July 1, 2020, 10the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 11used to issue directed payments to Illinois hospitals not 12identified in paragraph (g) on a monthly basis. Prior to the 13beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 14Department shall use encounter claims data from the 15Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 16Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 17services rendered by hospitals in each hospital class 18identified in paragraph (f) and not identified in paragraph 19(g). For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, the 20Department shall direct MCOs to make payments as follows:21        (1) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 22    to $1,750 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 23    20 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 24    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 25    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.26        (2) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal   HB2771 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    to $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 2    21 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 3    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 4    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.5        (3) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 6    to $80 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22 7    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 8    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 9    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.10        (4) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 11    to $375 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 12    24 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 13    by the hospital's total number of category of service 24 14    paid EAPG (EAPGs) for the determination quarter.15        (5) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 16    to $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 17    27 and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 18    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 19    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 20    quarter.21        (6) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 22    to $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 23    29 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 24    by the hospital's total number of category of service 29 25    paid EAPGs for the determination quarter.26        (7) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to   HB2771 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    $1,800 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 20 2    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 3    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 4    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.5        (8) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 6    $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 21 7    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 8    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 9    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.10        (9) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to $80 11    multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22 case 12    mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by the 13    hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 14    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.15        (10) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 16    $400 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 24 17    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 18    the hospital's total number of category of service 24 paid 19    EAPG outpatient claims for the determination quarter.20        (11) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 21    $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 27 22    and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 23    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 24    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 25    quarter.26        (12) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to   HB2771 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 29 2    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 3    the hospital's total number of category of service 29 paid 4    EAPGs for the determination quarter.5        (13) For long term acute care hospitals the amount of 6    $495 multiplied by the hospital's total number of 7    inpatient days for the determination quarter.8        (14) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $210 9    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient 10    days for category of service 21 for the determination 11    quarter.12        (15) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $250 13    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 14    claims for category of service 27 and 28 for the 15    determination quarter.16        (16) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $410 17    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient 18    days for category of service 22 for the determination 19    quarter.20        (17) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $100 21    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 22    claims for category of service 29 for the determination 23    quarter.24        (18) Effective for the Payout Quarter beginning 25    January 1, 2023, for the directed payments to hospitals 26    required under this subsection, the Department shall   HB2771 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    establish the amounts that shall be used to calculate such 2    directed payments using the methodologies specified in 3    this paragraph. The Department shall use a single, uniform 4    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1) 5    through (12), for all categories of inpatient services 6    provided by each class of hospitals and a single uniform 7    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1) 8    through (12), for all categories of outpatient services 9    provided by each class of hospitals. The Department shall 10    establish such amounts so that the total amount of 11    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 12    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 13    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 14    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 15    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 16    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 17    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 18    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 19    payment amounts to be established under this subsection on 20    its website by November 15, 2022. 21        (19) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of their 22    quarterly inpatient and outpatient directed payment in 23    each of the 3 months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance 24    with directions provided to each MCO by the Department.25        (20) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 26    Directed Payment amount as identified by the Department on   HB2771 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    its quarterly determination report.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if 3the Department determines that the actual total hospital 4utilization data that is used to calculate the fixed rate 5directed payments is substantially different than anticipated 6when the rates in this subsection were initially determined 7for unforeseeable circumstances (such as the COVID-19 pandemic 8or some other public health emergency), the Department may 9adjust the rates specified in this subsection so that the 10total directed payments approximate the total spending amount 11anticipated when the rates were initially established. 12    Definitions. As used in this subsection:13            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each calendar quarter, 14        beginning July 1, 2020.15            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each calendar 16        quarter which ends 3 months prior to the first day of 17        each Payout Quarter.18            (C) "Case mix index" means a hospital specific 19        calculation. For inpatient claims the case mix index 20        is calculated each quarter by summing the relative 21        weight of all inpatient Diagnosis-Related Group (DRG) 22        claims for a category of service in the applicable 23        Determination Quarter and dividing the sum by the 24        number of sum total of all inpatient DRG admissions 25        for the category of service for the associated claims. 26        The case mix index for outpatient claims is calculated   HB2771 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1        each quarter by summing the relative weight of all 2        paid EAPGs in the applicable Determination Quarter and 3        dividing the sum by the sum total of paid EAPGs for the 4        associated claims.5    (i) Beginning January 1, 2021, the rates for directed 6payments shall be recalculated in order to spend the 7additional funds for directed payments that result from 8reduction in the amount of pass-through payments allowed under 9federal regulations. The additional funds for directed 10payments shall be allocated proportionally to each class of 11hospitals based on that class' proportion of services.12        (1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed pool directed 13    payment amounts and the associated annual initial rates 14    referenced in paragraph (6) of subsection (f) for each 15    hospital class shall be uniformly increased by a ratio of 16    not less than, the ratio of the total pass-through 17    reduction amount pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection 18    (j), for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool 19    directed payment class for the next calendar year, to the 20    total inpatient and outpatient directed payments for the 21    hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool directed 22    payment class paid during the preceding calendar year. 23        (2) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed rates for the 24    directed payments referenced in paragraph (18) of 25    subsection (h) for each hospital class shall be uniformly 26    increased by a ratio of not less than, the ratio of the   HB2771 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    total pass-through reduction amount pursuant to paragraph 2    (4) of subsection (j), for the hospitals comprising the 3    hospital directed payment class for the next calendar 4    year, to the total inpatient and outpatient directed 5    payments for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed 6    rate directed payment class paid during the preceding 7    calendar year. 8    (j) Pass-through payments.9        (1) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 31, 10    2020, the Department shall assign quarterly pass-through 11    payments to each class of hospitals equal to one-fourth of 12    the following annual allocations:13            (A) $390,487,095 to safety-net hospitals.14            (B) $62,553,886 to critical access hospitals.15            (C) $345,021,438 to high Medicaid hospitals.16            (D) $551,429,071 to general acute care hospitals.17            (E) $27,283,870 to long term acute care hospitals.18            (F) $40,825,444 to freestanding psychiatric 19        hospitals.20            (G) $9,652,108 to freestanding rehabilitation 21        hospitals.22        (2) For the period of July 1, 2020 through December 23    31, 2020, the pass-through payments shall at a minimum 24    ensure hospitals receive a total amount of monthly 25    payments under this Section as received in calendar year 26    2019 in accordance with this Article and paragraph (1) of   HB2771 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    subsection (d-5) of Section 14-12, exclusive of amounts 2    received through payments referenced in subsection (b).3        (3) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2023, 4    the Department shall establish the annual pass-through 5    allocation to each class of hospitals and the pass-through 6    payments to each hospital so that the total amount of 7    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 8    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 9    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 10    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 11    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 12    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 13    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 14    constant. The Department shall publish the pass-through 15    allocation to each class and the pass-through payments to 16    each hospital to be established under this subsection on 17    its website by November 15, 2022. 18        (4) For the calendar years beginning January 1, 2021 19    and January 1, 2022, each hospital's pass-through payment 20    amount shall be reduced proportionally to the reduction of 21    all pass-through payments required by federal regulations. 22    Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department shall reduce 23    total pass-through payments by the minimum amount 24    necessary to comply with federal regulations. Pass-through 25    payments to safety-net hospitals, as defined in Section 26    5-5e.1 of this Code, shall not be reduced until all   HB2771 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    pass-through payments to other hospitals have been 2    eliminated. All other hospitals shall have their 3    pass-through payments reduced proportionally. 4    (k) At least 30 days prior to each calendar year, the 5Department shall notify each hospital of changes to the 6payment methodologies in this Section, including, but not 7limited to, changes in the fixed rate directed payment rates, 8the aggregate pass-through payment amount for all hospitals, 9and the hospital's pass-through payment amount for the 10upcoming calendar year.11    (l) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, 12the Department may adopt rules to change the methodology for 13directed and pass-through payments as set forth in this 14Section, but only to the extent necessary to obtain federal 15approval of a necessary State Plan amendment or Directed 16Payment Preprint or to otherwise conform to federal law or 17federal regulation.18    (m) As used in this subsection, "managed care 19organization" or "MCO" means an entity which contracts with 20the Department to provide services where payment for medical 21services is made on a capitated basis, excluding contracted 22entities for dual eligible or Department of Children and 23Family Services youth populations.24    (n) In order to address the escalating infant mortality 25rates among minority communities in Illinois, the State shall, 26subject to appropriation, create a pool of funding of at least   HB2771 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1$50,000,000 annually to be disbursed among safety-net 2hospitals that maintain perinatal designation from the 3Department of Public Health. The funding shall be used to 4preserve or enhance OB/GYN services or other specialty 5services at the receiving hospital, with the distribution of 6funding to be established by rule and with consideration to 7perinatal hospitals with safe birthing levels and quality 8metrics for healthy mothers and babies.9    (o) In order to address the growing challenges of 10providing stable access to healthcare in rural Illinois, 11including perinatal services, behavioral healthcare including 12substance use disorder services (SUDs) and other specialty 13services, and to expand access to telehealth services among 14rural communities in Illinois, the Department of Healthcare 15and Family Services shall administer a program to provide at 16least $10,000,000 in financial support annually to critical 17access hospitals for delivery of perinatal and OB/GYN 18services, behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other 19specialty services and telehealth services. The funding shall 20be used to preserve or enhance perinatal and OB/GYN services, 21behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other specialty 22services, as well as the explanation of telehealth services by 23the receiving hospital, with the distribution of funding to be 24established by rule. 25    (p) For calendar year 2023, the final amounts, rates, and 26payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), (h), and (j) shall   HB2771 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1be established by the Department, so that the sum of the total 2estimated annual payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), 3(h), and (j) for each hospital class for calendar year 2023, is 4no less than: 5        (1) $858,260,000 to safety-net hospitals.6        (2) $86,200,000 to critical access hospitals.7        (3) $1,765,000,000 to high Medicaid hospitals.8        (4) $673,860,000 to general acute care hospitals.9        (5) $48,330,000 to long term acute care hospitals.10        (6) $89,110,000 to freestanding psychiatric hospitals.11        (7) $24,300,000 to freestanding rehabilitation 12    hospitals.13        (8) $32,570,000 to public hospitals.14    (q) Hospital Pandemic Recovery Stabilization Payments. The 15Department shall disburse a pool of $460,000,000 in stability 16payments to hospitals prior to April 1, 2023. The allocation 17of the pool shall be based on the hospital directed payment 18classes and directed payments issued, during Calendar Year 192022 with added consideration to safety net hospitals, as 20defined in subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this Section, and critical 21access hospitals. 22    (r) Directed payment update. For calendar year 2025, and 23each calendar year thereafter, the final amounts, rates, and 24payments for the fixed pool directed payments described in 25subsection (g) and the fixed rate directed payments described 26in subsection (h) shall be established by the Department at no   HB2771 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1less than the following:2        (1) $579,261,585 for inpatient services at safety-net 3    hospitals.4        (2) $763,418,138 for outpatient services at safety-net 5    hospitals.6        (3) $12,389,160 for inpatient services at critical 7    access hospitals.8        (4) $137,437,866 for outpatient services at critical 9    access hospitals.10        (5) $5,418 as a base fixed rate per admit prior to 11    adjusting for acuity, for inpatient services at high 12    Medicaid hospitals.13        (6) $1,512 as a base fixed rate per paid E-APG prior to 14    adjusting for acuity, for outpatient services at high 15    Medicaid hospitals.16        (7) $3,898 as a base fixed rate per admit prior to 17    adjusting for acuity, for inpatient services at other 18    acute care hospitals.19        (8) $1,322 as a base fixed rate per E-APG prior to 20    adjusting for acuity, for outpatient services at other 21    acute hospitals.22        (9) $773 per day for inpatient services at long term 23    acute care hospitals.24        (10) $206 per day for inpatient services at 25    freestanding psychiatric hospitals.26        (11) $223 per claim for outpatient services at   HB2771 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    freestanding psychiatric hospitals.2        (12) $776 per day for inpatient services at 3    freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.4        (13) $252 per claim for outpatient services at 5    freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.6        (14) $7,793,812 for inpatient services at public 7    hospitals.8        (15) $26,849,592 for outpatient services at public 9    hospitals.10    Implementation of the rate increases described in this 11subsection (r) shall be contingent on federal approval. The 12rates for fixed pool directed payments as described in 13subsection (g) and for fixed rate directed payments as 14described in subsection (h) shall remain as published by the 15Department on November 27, 2024 until the Department receives 16federal approval for the updated rates described in this 17subsection (r). 18    (s) If, in order to secure approval by the Centers for 19Medicare and Medicaid Services, the rates under subsection (r) 20are reduced, the Department may submit a State Plan amendment 21to increase rates in place at the time of the reduction 22pertaining to subsection (d-2) to offset the annual amount of 23reduction to the rates under subsection (r), in amounts equal 24to the required reduction on a class-specific basis to ensure 25that funds are not reallocated from one class to another; or 26the rates in subsection (r) shall be reduced uniformly to the   HB2771 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1amounts necessary to achieve approval and the assessments 2imposed by subsection (a) or (b-5) of Section 5A-2 shall be 3reduced uniformly to achieve a total annual reduction across 4both assessments equal to the product of the total annual 5reduction to payments and .3853. In addition, the assessments 6shall further be reduced uniformly to achieve a total annual 7reduction across both assessments equal to the difference of 8subtracting the product calculated in the previous sentence 9from the resulting quotient of dividing the product described 10in the previous sentence by .92 for a reduction to the 11transfers in subsection 7.16 and 7.17 of Section 5A-8.12    (t) To provide for the expeditious and timely 13implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 14amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 15may adopt emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 16Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of 17emergency rules is deemed to be necessary for the public 18interest, safety, and welfare. 19(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 20102-886, eff. 5-17-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-102, eff. 216-16-23; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 22    (305 ILCS 5/5A-14)23    Sec. 5A-14. Repeal of assessments and disbursements.24    (a) (Blank). Section 5A-2 is repealed on December 31, 252026.  HB2771 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1    (b) Section 5A-12 is repealed on July 1, 2005. 2    (c) Section 5A-12.1 is repealed on July 1, 2008. 3    (d) Section 5A-12.2 and Section 5A-12.4 are repealed on 4July 1, 2018, subject to Section 5A-16. 5    (e) Section 5A-12.3 is repealed on July 1, 2011. 6    (f) Section 5A-12.6 is repealed on July 1, 2020. 7    (g) (Blank). Section 5A-12.7 is repealed on December 31, 82026. 9(Source: P.A. 101-650, eff. 7-7-20; 102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 10    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.105)11    Sec. 12-4.105. Human poison control center; payment 12program. Subject to funding availability resulting from 13transfers made from the Hospital Provider Fund to the 14Healthcare Provider Relief Fund as authorized under this Code, 15for State fiscal year 2017 and State fiscal year 2018, and for 16each State fiscal year thereafter in which the assessment 17under Section 5A-2 is imposed, the Department of Healthcare 18and Family Services shall pay to the human poison control 19center designated under the Poison Control System Act an 20amount of not less than $3,000,000 for each of State fiscal 21years 2017 through 2020, and for State fiscal years 2021 22through 2023 an amount of not less than $3,750,000 and for 23State fiscal year years 2024 through 2026 an amount of not less 24than $4,000,000, and for State fiscal year 2025 an amount not 25less than $4,500,000, and for State fiscal year 2026, and each   HB2771 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 08638 BDA 18691 b1fiscal year thereafter, an amount of not less than $4,750,000 2and for the period July 1, 2026 through December 31, 2026 an 3amount of not less than $2,000,000, if the human poison 4control center is in operation.5(Source: P.A. 102-886, eff. 5-17-22; 103-102, eff. 6-16-23.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.